District of Columbia statutes.
25-337

Wholesaler’s license prohibited in residential-use district.

No wholesaler’s license shall be issued for an establishment in a residential-use district as defined in the zoning regulations and shown in the official atlases of the Zoning Commission for the District.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 328, ch. 4, § 15
June 16, 1934, 48 Stat. 974, ch. 552
May 22, 1958, 72 Stat. 132, Pub. L. 85-423, § 1
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 10, 34 DCR 907
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(g), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-258, § 2(b), 44 DCR 1421
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 15, 45 DCR 745
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-337.
1973 Ed., § 25-116.